New York, session 2025-2026, S8634.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 3 of subdivision (d) of section 1111-c-1 of the 2 vehicle and traffic law, as added by section 1 of part MM of chapter 56 3 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 3. "bus operation-related traffic regulations" shall mean the follow- 5 ing provisions set forth in chapter four of title thirty-four of the 6 rules of the city of New York, adopted pursuant to section sixteen 7 hundred forty-two of this chapter: 4-08(c)(3), violation of posted no 8 standing rules prohibited-bus stop; 4-08(e)(9), general no stopping 9 zones-bicycle lanes; 4-08(f)(1), general no standing zones-double park- 10 ing; and 4-08(f)(4), general no standing zones-bus lane. Provided, 11 however, it shall not be considered a violation of any of the aforemen- 12 tioned regulations when such violation occurred within one hundred feet 13 of a place of worship, funeral home, or similar institution as part of 14 participation in a ceremony or religious service. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 16 the amendments to section 1111-c-1 of the vehicle and traffic law, made 17 by section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such section 18 and shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13340-01-5